Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 33 COLORADO SURFACE COAL MINING RECLAMATION ACT
34-33-126. Designating areas unsuitable for surface coal mining.

Upon petition pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the board shall designate an area as unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations if the board determines, based upon competent and scientifically sound data and information derived from the database and inventory system established in section 34-33-130 or from any other source, that reclamation of the subject area pursuant to the requirements of this article is not technically and economically feasible.

Upon petition pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a surface area may be designated unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations if such operations will:

Be incompatible with state or local land use plans or programs;

Adversely affect fragile or historic lands in which such operations could result in significant damage to important historic, cultural, scientific, or esthetic values or natural systems;

Adversely affect renewable resource lands in which such operations could result in a substantial loss or reduction of long-range productivity of water supply or food or fiber products, such lands to include aquifer and aquifer recharge areas; or

Affect natural hazard areas in which such operations could substantially endanger life and property, such lands to include areas subject to frequent flooding and areas of unstable geology.

Determination of the unsuitability of land for surface coal mining operations under this section shall be integrated as closely as possible with present and future land use planning, leasing, and regulation processes at the federal, state, and local levels.

Any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected or any duly authorized governmental agency shall have the right to petition the board to have an area designated as unsuitable for all or certain types of surface coal mining operations or to have such designation terminated. Any such petition which includes acreage identified in a pending permit application pursuant to the requirements of section 34-33-111 (1)(a) shall be filed with the board prior to completion of the informal conference provided for in section 34-33-118 (6) concerning such pending permit application. If no such informal conference is requested with respect to such pending permit application, such petition shall be filed with the board on or before thirty days after the last publication of the notice provided for in section 34-33-118 (2). The petition shall be in writing, shall be directed to the board, and shall contain the following information:

The name, address, and telephone number of the petitioner;

The identification, including applicable range and township numbers, of the areas proposed for designation and a brief description of such areas. The petitioner shall make a good faith effort to identify the owners of record of surface and mineral interests in the land proposed for either designation or termination of designation and shall include a list of the names so obtained with the petition.

The identification of the petitioner's interest which is or may be adversely affected;

Any allegations of fact with supporting evidence which would tend to establish the allegations.

Within thirty days after receipt of the petition, the board shall notify the petitioner in writing as to the completeness or incompleteness of the petition. In the event the petition is deemed incomplete, the petitioner shall be notified in writing of the specific aspects of the petition which render it incomplete and be provided an opportunity to amend, revise, or otherwise make said petition complete.

Within thirty days after the filing of a complete petition, the office shall make a determination of whether any identified coal resources exist in the area covered by the petition, whether the petition is frivolous, and, if the area or part thereof has been the subject of a previous unsuccessful petition to establish or terminate an unsuitability designation, whether any new factual allegations not contained in such previous petition are included in the petition. If the office determines that there are no identified coal resources in the area covered by the petition, the petition shall be returned to the petitioner with a statement of the finding. If the office determines that the petition is frivolous or that no new factual allegations are contained in the petition covering lands which were the subject of a previous unsuccessful petition, the office shall recommend to the board that the petition be dismissed and provide written notice to the petitioner of such recommendation. At its next regularly scheduled meeting following such recommendation of dismissal by the office, but in no event less than thirty days following notice to the petitioner of the office's recommendation, the board shall accept or reject the office's determination after providing the petitioner and other interested parties an opportunity to be heard at such meeting regarding the office's recommendation. If the board accepts the office's determination, the office shall promptly notify the petitioner that the petition has been dismissed and state the reasons therefor.

Within thirty days after the filing of a complete petition, notice of the petition shall be sent by the office to the owners of record of all surface and mineral interests in the land included in such petition, and a copy of the petition shall be available at all times for inspection by the public in the office of the office of active and inactive mines. The office shall include a list of pending petitions in the monthly mailings of the office.

Within ten months after the receipt of a complete petition, the board shall hold a public hearing in the locality of the affected area. At least one month prior to the date of public hearing, the board shall notify, in writing, the owners of all surface and mineral interests in the affected area regarding the time and place of the public hearing as well as the location where a copy of the subject petition may be examined. At least one month prior to the date of the public hearing, the board shall also publish, in a newspaper of general circulation in the area to be affected by the petition, a notice of the public hearing with a description of the area to be affected as well as the location where a copy of the petition may be examined.

A copy of the petition shall be sent to the county clerk and recorder of each county affected by such petition for recording in the real property records of said county and shall be made available for inspection by the public.

After the filing of a petition and no later than fifteen days before the public hearing, any person may intervene. A petition to intervene shall contain allegations and supporting evidence which tends to establish or refute the allegations contained in the petition.

Within sixty days after the public hearing on the petition, the board shall issue and furnish to the petitioner and any other party to the hearing a written decision on the petition and the reasons therefor. Any decision of the board on the petition shall be sent to the county clerk and recorder of each county affected by such petition for recording in the real property records of such counties.

Prior to designating any area as unsuitable for surface coal mining operations, the board shall prepare and make available for public inspection and copy, at least one month prior to the hearing provided for in paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section, a detailed statement on:

The potential coal resources of the area;

The demand for coal resources; and

The impact of such designation on the environment, the economy, and the supply of coal.

The requirements of this section shall not apply to federal lands or to lands on which surface coal mining operations were being conducted on August 3, 1977, or under a permit issued pursuant to this article, or where substantial legal and financial commitments in such operations were in existence prior to January 4, 1977.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1297, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2)(c) and (2)(d) amended, p. 1968, § 69, effective July 1.

34-33-127. Public agencies, public utilities, and public corporations.

Any agency, unit, or instrumentality of federal, state, or local government, including any publicly owned utility or publicly owned corporation of federal, state, or local government, which proposes to engage in surface coal mining operations, which are subject to the requirements of this article, shall comply with the provisions of this article.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1299, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1895, § 4, effective May 29.

34-33-128. Judicial review.

Any order or decision issued by the board in a civil penalty proceeding, or in a proceeding under section 34-33-126 to establish an unsuitability designation, or in any proceeding required to be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., shall be subject to judicial review on or before thirty days after the date of such order or decision in accordance with subsection (2) of this section in the district court of this state for the district in which the surface coal mining operation is located. In the case of a proceeding to review an order or decision issued by the board under section 34-33-124, the court shall have jurisdiction to enter an order requiring payment of any civil penalty assessment enforced by its judgment.

The court shall hear such petition or complaint solely on the record made before the board. The findings of the board, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive. The court may affirm, vacate, or modify any order or decision or may remand the proceedings to the board for such further action as it may direct.

In the case of a proceeding to review any order or decision issued by the board under this article, the court may, under such conditions as it may prescribe, grant such temporary relief as it deems appropriate pending final determination of the proceedings if:

All parties to the proceedings have been notified and given an opportunity to be heard on a request for temporary relief;

The person requesting such relief shows that there is a substantial likelihood that he will prevail on the merits of the final determination of the proceeding; and

Such relief will not adversely affect the public health or safety or cause significant imminent environmental harm to land, air, or water resources.

At the request of any party to a proceeding under this section, the court may assess costs and expenses, including attorney fees, against any party, as the court deems just and proper.

The commencement of a proceeding under this section shall not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the action, order, or decision of the board.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1300, § 1, effective July 1.

34-33-129. Surface coal mining operations not subject to this article.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any of the following activities:

The extraction of coal by a landowner for such landowner's own noncommercial use from land owned or leased by said landowner; and

(Deleted by amendment, L. 92, p. 1895, § 5, effective May 29, 1992.)

The extraction of coal as an incidental part of federal, state, or local government-financed highway or other construction under regulations established by the board.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1300, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 1895, § 5, effective May 29.

34-33-130. Data inventory.

The board is hereby authorized and directed to cooperate with and seek assistance from state, county, and federal agencies and universities and research institutions in this state and to work in close cooperation with local planning units in order to establish a database and an inventory system, drawing upon existing resources where possible, which will:

Provide proper evaluation of the capacity of different land areas of the state to be reclaimed following surface coal mining operations;

Be available to those making land use planning decisions concerning surface coal mining operations;

Provide objective and scientific evaluation of fragile, historic, natural hazard, and renewable resource lands and lands listed in the Colorado natural areas registry or designated under the Colorado natural areas program.

The board shall promulgate such rules and regulations which it deems necessary to establish such a database and inventory system, and, in so doing, the board shall take into consideration those criteria and definitions which other federal and state agencies have adopted for use in determining lands unsuitable for mining.

The board may, at its discretion, appoint an advisory committee to assist it in establishing a database and inventory system for surface coal mining operations. Such committee, if appointed, shall consist of experts in the areas of wildlife, plant ecology, natural areas, historic areas, reclamation, agriculture, coal geology, and land management planning and other areas as deemed necessary by the board.

Repealed.

The board is further authorized and directed to accept and seek grants and financial aid from the federal government and from private agencies for carrying out the purposes of this section.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1301, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(3) amended, p. 424, § 55, effective March 26.

L. 88:

(3)(b) amended, p. 318, § 15, effective April 14.

L. 90:

(3)(b) and (3)(c) repealed, p. 334, § 24, effective April 3.

34-33-131. Informal opinion as to alluvial valley floors.

Any person who proposes to engage in surface coal mining operations may, prior to making an application for a permit under this article, request that the board give an informal opinion on whether or not the area of land to be affected by such proposed operations is in, or adjacent to, an alluvial valley floor. Any such informal opinion shall be based upon sound scientific data, shall be in writing, and shall be advisory in nature.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1301, § 1, effective July 1.

34-33-132. Special coordination and review process - site-specific agreements.

The department and any person contemplating opening a surface coal mining operation in this state may, at their discretion, enter into one or more site-specific agreements to identify and coordinate local, state, and federal government jurisdiction and review of land use planning, environmental analysis, and socioeconomic evaluation, to establish coordinating procedures for required action, and to ensure that such procedures be undertaken in a timely, sequential manner. Any such agreements shall be consistent with the provisions of this article.

Such site-specific agreements may include:

The schedule for completion of data collection required for environmental, technical, and policy review; and

The schedule for completion of evaluation, review, and comments by all parties.

Such agreements may list all applicable laws, regulations, and ordinances of this state and its agencies, the federal government and its agencies, and of the county or counties in which the proposed operation will be situated. The department may, with the advice and concurrence of the board, develop rules and regulations to ensure relative uniformity in such agreements.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1301, § 1, effective July 1.

34-33-133. Abandoned mine reclamation plan.

The office of active and inactive mines is authorized and directed to develop, in accordance with the provision of Title IV of the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", as amended, and the rules and regulations thereunder, an abandoned mine reclamation program which may provide for, but need not be limited to, the following:

Protection of public health, safety, general welfare, and property from the dangers and adverse effects of past mining practices;

Acquisition, reclamation, and restoration of land and water resources previously degraded by the adverse effects of mining, including measures for the conservation and development of soil, water, woodland, fish and wildlife, recreation and tourism resources, and agricultural productivity;

The protection, repair, replacement, construction, or enhancement of public facilities in communities affected by coal or other energy development.

The office of active and inactive mines is authorized and directed to:

Apply for, receive, and expend grant moneys or other funds for the development, administration, and fulfillment of the requirements of an abandoned mine reclamation program;

Apply for, receive, and expend such funds legally available to Colorado from the abandoned mine reclamation fund established by Title IV of the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", as amended;

Invite public inspection of, comment on, and involvement in the formulation of the abandoned mine reclamation program;

Submit the abandoned mine reclamation program, after public review, to the secretary for approval and funding;

Amend the approved abandoned mine reclamation program from time to time, after public review of the proposed amendments, as may be necessary or desirable.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1896, § 6, effective May 29; entire section amended, p. 1968, § 70, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", see 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

34-33-133.5. Colorado mine subsidence protection program - rules.

The board is authorized and directed to issue rules and regulations to develop a Colorado mine subsidence protection program, which shall provide protection for owners of private residential structures against damages caused by land subsidence from underground coal mines. The program shall be operated in accordance with the provisions of Title IV of the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", as amended, and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. The board may assess and expend fees collected from participants who are insured under the program, and expend interest earned on such fees as necessary to defray administrative costs of the program. In its discretion, the board may delegate such power and responsibility, by rule-making, to the division.

Creation of trust. The Colorado coal mine subsidence trust is hereby created as part of the board. Trust funds shall be held in custody by the state treasurer in a fund to be known as the Colorado coal mine subsidence trust fund, which fund is hereby created. Moneys granted to the state by the federal government for the purposes specified in subsection (1) of this section, together with all interest earned, shall be credited to such trust fund. The state treasurer shall invest trust assets in lawful investments. The trust funds shall be available to the board to carry out the purposes of the Colorado mine subsidence protection program established pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 1896, § 7, effective May 29.

Cross references:

For the "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", see 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.

34-33-134. Experimental practices.

In order to encourage advances in coal mining and reclamation practices and to allow postmining land use for industrial, commercial, residential, or public use, including recreational facilities, the board, with the approval of the secretary, may authorize departures in individual cases on an experimental basis from the environmental protection performance standards promulgated under sections 34-33-120 and 34-33-121. Such departures may be authorized if: The experimental practices are potentially more or at least as environmentally protective, during and after coal mining operations, as those required by promulgated standards; the coal mining operations approved for particular land use or other purposes are not larger or more numerous than necessary to determine the effectiveness and economic feasibility of the experimental practices; and the experimental practices do not reduce the protection afforded the public health and safety below that provided by promulgated standards.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1302, § 1, effective July 1.

34-33-135. Civil actions.

Subject to the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, any person having an interest which is or may be adversely affected may commence a civil action on such person's own behalf to compel compliance with the provisions of this article against:

Any person or governmental agency or instrumentality who is alleged to be in violation of any provision of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated or any order or permit issued pursuant to this article; or

The board or office when there is alleged a failure of the board or office to perform any act or duty under this article which is not discretionary with the board or office.

No action may be commenced under:

Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section prior to sixty days after the plaintiff has given notice in writing of the alleged violation, setting forth such matters as the board shall by regulation prescribe, to the attorney general, the board and office, and any alleged violator;

Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section prior to sixty days after the plaintiff has given notice in writing of the alleged violation, setting forth such matters as the board shall by regulation prescribe, to the board and office and the attorney general; except that such action may be brought immediately after such notification of the alleged failure of the board or office complained of if such failure constitutes an imminent threat to the health or safety of the plaintiff or would immediately affect a legal interest of the plaintiff.

(2.5) The board or the office may intervene as a matter of right in any action commenced pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section to which they are not otherwise a party.

Any action initiated pursuant to this section shall be tried in such county as is provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

The court, in issuing any final order in any action brought pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, may award costs of litigation, including attorney and expert witness fees, to any party, whenever the court determines such award is appropriate. The court shall, if a temporary restraining order or injunction is sought, require the filing of a bond or equivalent security to the extent required by the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

Nothing in this section shall restrict any right which any person or class of persons may have under any statute or common law to seek enforcement of any of the provisions of this article or the regulations promulgated under this article or to seek any other allowable relief, including relief against the appropriate state agency.

Any person who is injured in person or property through the violation by an operator of any rule or regulation promulgated or any order or permit issued pursuant to this article may bring an action for damages, including reasonable attorney and expert witness fees, against such operator only in the county where said violation occurred. Nothing in this subsection (6) shall affect the rights established by or limits imposed under the workers' compensation laws of this state.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1303, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(2.5) added, p. 1684, § 8, effective June 16.

L. 87:

(2)(b) amended, p. 1273, § 1, effective May 13.

L. 90:

(6) amended, p. 573, § 70, effective July 1.

L. 92:

IP(1), (1)(b), (2), and (2.5) amended, p. 1969, § 71, effective July 1.

34-33-136. Water rights.

Nothing contained in this article shall be construed to affect or impair the rights and obligations attendant upon the ownership of water rights under Colorado water law.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1304, § 1, effective July 1.

34-33-137. Reservation clause.

Passage of this article shall not be deemed to be an admission by the state of Colorado as to the legality or constitutionality of the federal "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", as amended, and shall not be construed to limit, waive, or otherwise affect the right of the state of Colorado, or its agencies, from contesting the constitutional or statutory validity of any part, section, provision, requirement, or regulation promulgated under such act, pursuant to which this article has been enacted.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1304, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977", see 30 U.S.C. § 1201 et seq.